Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-3420
Provision of information and records; subpoenas; contempt.

(1) For purposes of conducting an investigation, and as necessary to fulfill the purposes of the Domestic Abuse Death Review Act, the team shall be immediately provided the following upon request:

(a) Records, documents, or other information maintained by a health care provider, mental health provider, or other medical professional, including medical records, mental health records, therapy records, and emergency medical services records; and

(b) All information and records maintained by any state agency, county or local government, political subdivision, school district, or public or private educational institution, including birth and death certificates; protection orders; dissolution, mediation, custody, and child support agreements; court records, including juvenile cases and dismissed criminal cases; law enforcement agency investigative information and reports; autopsy reports; educational records; Department of Correctional Services information and records; parole and probation information and records; and information and records of any social services agency, including juvenile records, that provided services to the decedent victim, an associated victim, or the perpetrator.

(2) Except as provided in section 71-3415, the Attorney General shall have the authority to issue subpoenas to compel production of any of the records and information specified in this section.

(3) Any failure to respond to such subpoena shall be certified by the Attorney General to the district court of Lancaster County for enforcement or punishment for contempt of court.

Laws 2022, LB741, § 45.